Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.020

Registration date.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for voter registration applicants, the date the voter registration application is received by an election official will be used as the registration date for the purpose of registering and meeting the registration cutoff deadline.

[ 2019 c 391 s 3; 2013 c 11 s 12; 2004 c 267 s 103; 2003 c 111 s 204; 1994 c 57 s 30; 1993 c 434 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.08.010.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—1994 c 57: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.